Maryland, session 2025, SB0590.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 16–402(a)(17) of Article – Transportation of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 16–402(a)(13)
through (16) and (28) through (46) of Article – Transportation of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 16–402(a)(14) through (17) and (29) through (47),
respectively.
– 1 –

Ch. 447 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Transportation
16–402.
(a) After the conviction of an individual for a violation of Title 2, Subtitle 5, §
2–209, § 3–211, or § 10–110 of the Criminal Law Article, or of the vehicle laws or regulations
of this State or of any local authority, points shall be assessed against the individual as of
the date of violation and as follows:
(13) NEGLIGENT DRIVING ………………………………………... 2 POINTS
(28) SPEEDING IN EXCESS OF THE POSTED SPEED LIMIT BY 30 MILES
PER HOUR OR MORE ……………………………………………………………….. 6 POINTS
21–901.1.
(a) A person is guilty of reckless driving if [he] THE PERSON drives a motor
vehicle:
(1) In wanton or willful disregard for the safety of persons or property; [or]
(2) In a manner that indicates a wanton or willful disregard for the safety
of persons or property; OR
(3) AT A SPEED AT LEAST 30 MILES PER HOUR ABOVE THE POSTED
SPEED LIMIT.
(b) A person is guilty of negligent driving if [he] THE PERSON drives a motor
vehicle in a careless or imprudent manner that endangers any property or the life or person
of any individual.
(c) (1) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (a) of this section is
subject to IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 60 DAYS OR a fine not exceeding $1,000 OR
BOTH.
(2) A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $750.
21–901.2.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 447
(A) A person is guilty of aggressive driving if the person commits [three] TWO or
more of the following offenses at the same time or during a single and continuous period of
driving in violation of:
(1) § 21–201 OF THIS TITLE (FAILURE TO OBEY TRAFFIC CONTROL
DEVICE OR LEAVING ROADWAY TO AVOID TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICE);
(2) § 21–202 of this title (Traffic lights with steady indication);
[(2)] (3) § 21–303 of this title (Overtaking and passing vehicles);
[(3)] (4) § 21–304 of this title (Passing on right);
(5) § 21–305 OF THIS TITLE (DRIVING LEFT OF CENTER OF ROADWAY
IN OVERTAKING AND PASSING VEHICLE);
(6) § 21–307 OF THIS TITLE (DRIVING ON LEFT IN NO–PASSING ZONE);
[(4)] (7) § 21–309 of this title (Driving on laned roadways);
[(5)] (8) § 21–310 of this title (Following too closely);
[(6)] (9) § 21–403 of this title (Failure to yield right–of–way); [or]
(10) § 21–502(A)(2) OF THIS TITLE (FAILURE TO STOP FOR
PEDESTRIAN IN CROSSWALK);
(11) § 21–502(C) OF THIS TITLE (OVERTAKING AND PASSING VEHICLE
STOPPED FOR PEDESTRIAN IN CROSSWALK);
(12) § 21–706 OF THIS TITLE (OVERTAKING AND PASSING SCHOOL
VEHICLE STOPPED AND OPERATING ALTERNATELY FLASHING RED LIGHTS);
(13) § 21–707 OF THIS TITLE (STOP SIGNS AND YIELD SIGNS);
[(7)] (14) § 21–801.1 of this title (Exceeding [a] maximum speed limit or
posted maximum speed limit);
(15) § 21–1117 OF THIS TITLE (SKIDDING, SPINNING WHEELS, AND
EXCESSIVE NOISE);
(16) § 21–1131 OF THIS TITLE (DISCHARGING DIESEL EMISSIONS ONTO
ANOTHER);
– 3 –

Ch. 447 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(17) § 21–1209(A) OF THIS TITLE (AVOIDING COLLISION AND
OVERTAKING AND PASSING BICYCLE, EPAMD, OR MOTOR SCOOTER);
(18) § 21–1303(C) OF THIS TITLE (MOTORCYCLE OVERTAKING AND
PASSING IN SAME LANE AS ANOTHER VEHICLE); OR
(19) § 21–1303(D) OF THIS TITLE (MOTORCYCLE OPERATING
BETWEEN LANES OF TRAFFIC OR VEHICLES).
(B) A PERSON CONVICTED OF A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO
A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 4 –